California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1841.

When the review, equalization, and adjustment are completed, the executive director of the board shall transmit to the auditor and the governing body of the taxing agency whose assessment is questioned, and to the applicant a notice of the action of the board with respect to the assessment. The notice is prima facie evidence of the regularity of all proceedings of the board resulting in the action that is the subject matter of the notice. Upon receipt of the notice the auditor shall enter upon the local roll any change in the assessment resulting from the action of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Equalized County Assessment Roll [2050. - 2125.]

2050.

Whenever, for the purpose of determining the assessed value of property on the county assessment roll or determining the names or addresses of assessees on such roll, the State Constitution, any law, any charter of a city or a county, or any ordinance, resolution, order or regulation of any city, county or other public corporation makes reference to the “last equalized county assessment roll” in those words or in similar words, or in any words intended to refer to the latest or current assessment roll of the county, such roll (hereinafter referred to as the “last equalized roll”) shall be ascertained in accordance with the rules provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 219.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

The last equalized roll means the entire assessment roll as defined in Section 109.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 219.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

The local roll as delivered to the auditor pursuant to Section 617, including any changes made by the county board during the month of July, together with the board roll as transmitted to the auditor pursuant to Section 756 and the estimate with any changes transmitted pursuant to Section 755, shall become the last equalized roll on August 20, and such rolls together shall continue to be the last equalized roll, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, (a) for the purpose of computing any debt limit for the issuance of bonds of any public entity that is based on a percentage of assessed valuation as shown on the last equalized assessment roll and (b) for all other purposes, until the assessment roll for the following year becomes the last equalized roll in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 20.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

If the board makes any change in the local roll pursuant to Sections 1840 and 1841, the local roll as so changed, together with the board roll as transmitted to the auditor pursuant to Section 756 and the estimate with any changes transmitted pursuant to Section 755, shall become the last equalized roll on the date the auditor receives notice of the action of the board, except for the purpose of computing any debt limit referred to in Section 2052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

If the county board of equalization, or an assessment appeals board, as the case may be, makes any changes in the local roll pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1601), and including any other changes in the local roll made pursuant to law, together with the board roll as transmitted to the auditor pursuant to Section 756 and the estimate with any changes transmitted pursuant to Section 755, shall become the last equalized roll on the third day after the final adjournment of the county board of equalization or all assessment appeals boards of the county as the case may be, except for the purpose of computing any debt limit referred to in Section 2052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

Whenever it becomes necessary for any purpose otherwise required by law to determine the assessed value of public property or other property exempt from taxation, as such assessed value is shown on the last equalized roll, and no value is shown on the roll for such property, and there is no other applicable provision for determining such assessed value, the assessor shall, upon request, provide in writing an estimate of the value according to his current assessment practices, and such estimate shall be deemed to be the assessed value for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 219.)
-------------------------------------------

2125.

In any county in which tax receipts derived from the assessment of water rights have been impounded by reason of court litigation, whenever any state department, board or agency allocates funds to the county or any district lying wholly or partly within the county upon the basis of the assessed valuation of property, the value of all land, improvements and tangible personal property entered upon the local roll of the county after equalization, shall be adjusted for purposes of such allocation to eliminate the assessed valuation as to which the taxes were impounded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. DISTRICTS LOCATED IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY: ALTERNATE METHOD OF COMPUTING LEVIES ON BASIS OF TENTATIVE FULL VALUES [2131. - 2134.]

2131.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board of supervisors of any county in which a portion of the territory of a district described in this section is located may, by adoption of a resolution on or before the first day of January of any year, require such district to cause the levy of any district tax or assessment in accordance with the provisions of this part. If the board of supervisors has adopted such a resolution, the board of directors of the district shall, on or before the last day of January following adoption of the board of supervisors’ resolution, adopt a resolution, or the board of directors may, without such action by the board of supervisors, adopt such a resolution on or before the last day of January of any year, to cause the levy of any district tax or assessment in accordance with the provisions of this part, if:

(1) The territory within the boundaries of the district is situated in more than one county; and

(2) The portion of the district tax or assessment levied on locally assessable property is imposed according to the value of such property as it appears on the local rolls in the respective counties in which the district is situated.

(b) As used in this part, “district” means an agency of the state, formed pursuant to general law or special act, for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “District” shall exclude the following:

(1) The state.

(2) A county.

(3) A city.

(4) A special assessment district.

(5) An improvement district.

(6) A county service area.

(7) A metropolitan water district.

(c) As used in this part, “board of directors” means the legislative body or governing board of a district.

(d) A resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for at least one year but may be rendered ineffective at any time thereafter by a resolution so stating adopted on or before the last day of January of the year in which the levy of the district’s tax or assessment shall no longer be imposed in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

2132.

(a) If a resolution has been adopted pursuant to Section 2131, the board of directors shall:

(1) Determine the total amount of revenue required by the district which will be derived from an ad valorem tax or ad valorem assessment on property on the secured roll.

(2) Divide the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) among the counties in which the district is situated in the proportions that the estimated full values of taxable property on the secured roll within the district in the respective counties bear to the estimated total full value of such property within the district.

(b) The estimated full value shall be determined by adding the figures for the several counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 678, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

2133.

(a) If a district has been formed under an enabling act which does not provide that the board of directors shall fix district tax rates, any board of directors which has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 2131 shall certify, on or before September 1st of each year, to the auditor of each county in which the district is located the total amount of revenue to be derived from an ad valorem tax or assessment on property within the district on the county’s secured roll, as such total is determined pursuant to Section 2132.

(b) If a district has been formed under an enabling act which requires the board of directors to fix district tax rates, any board of directors which has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 2131 shall fix the rate of district tax for each county in which the district is located at the rate which is necessary in order to raise the amount of revenue apportioned to each such county pursuant to Section 2132. Immediately after fixing such rates, the board of directors shall transmit to the auditor of each county in which the district is located a statement of the rate of district tax fixed by the board of directors for such county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

2134.

Any district levying or causing to be levied a tax in accordance with the provisions of this part may levy or cause to be levied a tax in one or more counties in excess of any maximum tax rate established by law or pursuant to law; provided that the total revenue to be received from the tax levies in all counties does not exceed the total revenue which would have been received by the district by levying the tax at the maximum rate in all counties without complying with the provisions of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. LEVY OF TAX [2151. - 2326.]



  CHAPTER 1. Determination of Tax [2151. - 2152.5.]

2151.

The board of supervisors shall fix the rates of county and district taxes and shall levy the State, county, and district taxes as provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2152.

The auditor shall then:

(a) Compute and enter in a separate column on the roll the respective sums in dollars and cents, rejecting the fractions of a cent, to be paid as a tax on the property listed. Notwithstanding any contrary provisions elsewhere set forth in the law, all rates applicable to any assessment may be combined into a single figure for purposes of computation and extension of the roll.

(b) Place in other columns the respective amounts due in installments.

(c) Foot each column, showing the totals.

Provided, however, that if the assessment roll is a machine-prepared roll the above prescribed computations and entries may be made and entered upon a newly prepared roll which shall incorporate the adjustments authorized by the local board of equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

2152.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law of this State, if so ordered by resolution of the board of supervisors of any county, adopted prior to the time the county auditor is required to compute and enter on the secured roll the respective amounts due in installments as taxes for the assessment year in which such resolution shall become effective, the county auditor shall reject any cent not evenly divisible by two in the computation of taxes on any assessment and in the extension of taxes, special assessments or charges on the county assessment roll for any other public agency. The provisions of this section shall continue in effect in such county until otherwise ordered by resolution of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1926.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Effect of Tax [2186. - 2196.]

2186.

Every tax has the effect of a judgment against the person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2187.

Every tax, penalty, or interest, including redemption penalty or interest, on real property is a lien against the property assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.

Every tax on improvements is a lien on the taxable land on which they are located, if they are assessed to the same person to whom the land is assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 782.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.1.

Every tax on improvements assessed to a person other than the assessee of the land on which they are located may become a lien on the real property of the owner of such improvements or be assessed on the unsecured roll. In order for such tax on improvements to be a lien on any parcel of real property of the owner of such improvements, the fact of such lien must be indicated on the secured roll where any such parcel of real property is listed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1412.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.2.

Whenever improvements are owned by a person other than the owner of the land on which they are located, the owner of the improvements or the owner of the land may file with the assessor a written statement before the lien date attesting to their separate ownership, in which event the land and improvements shall not be assessed to the same assessee.

Such written statement shall not be required annually following the year in which it has been filed but shall remain in effect until such time as either, or both, of said separate ownerships shall have been transferred or until such written statement of separate ownership shall have been canceled by either the owner of the land or the owner of the improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.3.

Whenever real property has been divided into condominiums, as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, (a) each condominium owned in fee shall be separately assessed to the owner thereof, and the tax on each such condominium shall constitute a lien solely thereon; (b) each condominium not owned in fee shall be separately assessed, as if it were owned in fee, to the owner of the condominium or the owner of the fee or both (and the tax on each such condominium shall be a lien solely on the interest of the owner of the fee in the real property included in such condominium and on such condominium), if so agreed by the assessor in a writing of record; such an agreement shall be binding upon such assessor and his successors in office with respect to such project so long as it continues to be divided into condominiums in the same manner as that in effect when the agreement was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.4.

Whenever a portion of a parcel of land, other than that used for grazing or other agricultural purposes and property assessed by the State Board of Equalization, is subject to a lease which is recorded or for which a memorandum of lease is recorded and which provides for a term (including options to renew) of 15 years or more from the commencement date of the lease and which requires the lessee to pay, or to reimburse the lessor for, the property taxes (or any portion thereof) on the leased premises, the assessor shall separately assess the land and improvements subject to the lease and the land and improvements not subject to the lease upon application for such separate assessments by the lessor or lessee prior to the lien date; provided the boundaries of the leased area do not pass through any improvement except along a bearing partition; and provided that each parcel as described must have access frontage on a dedicated street. The assessor shall thereafter continue to make such separate assessments until the expiration date of the lease or at an earlier date should the lessor or lessee file a written request that the separate assessments be discontinued.

The assessor may, in his discretion, assess the leased premises to the lessor or the lessee; provided, that if the lessor is assessed, all notices of assessment and tax bills relating to the leased premises shall be mailed to the lessor in care of the lessee at the lessee’s latest address known to the assessor, or a copy of such notices and bills shall be mailed to the lessee at such address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1282.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.5.

(a) (1) Subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (b), whenever real property has been divided into planned developments as defined in Section 11003 of the Business and Professions Code, the interests therein shall be presumed to be the value of each separately owned lot, parcel, or area, and the assessment shall reflect this value, which includes all of the following:

(A) The assessment attributable to the value of the separately owned lot, parcel, or area and the improvements thereon.

(B) The assessment attributable to the share in the common area reserved as an appurtenance of the separately owned lot, parcel, or area.

(C) The new base year value of the common area resulting from any change in ownership pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60) or new construction pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 70) attributable to the share in the common area reserved as an appurtenance of the separately owned lot, parcel, or area.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “common area” shall mean the land and improvements within a lot, parcel, or area, the beneficial use and enjoyment of which is reserved in whole or in part as an appurtenance to the separately owned lots, parcels, or areas, whether this common area is held in common or through ownership of shares of stock or membership in an owners’ association. The tax on each separately owned lot, parcel, or area shall constitute a lien solely thereon and upon the proportionate interest in the common area appurtenant thereto.

(b) Assessment in accordance with subdivision (a) shall only be required with respect to those planned developments that satisfy both of the following conditions:

(1) The development is located entirely within a single tax code area.

(2) The entire beneficial ownership of the common area is reserved as an appurtenance to the separately owned lots, parcels, or areas.

(c) The amendment to subdivision (b) made by Chapter 407 of the Statutes of 1984 shall apply to real property that has been divided into planned developments, as defined in Section 11003 of the Business and Professions Code, on and after the effective date of Chapter 407 of the Statutes of 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 610.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.6.

(a) Unless a request for exemption has been recorded pursuant to subdivision (d), prior to the creation of a condominium as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, the county assessor may separately assess each individual unit which is shown on the condominium plan of a proposed condominium project when all of the following documents have been recorded as required by law:

(1) A subdivision final map or parcel map, as described in Sections 66434 and 66445, respectively, of the Government Code.

(2) A condominium plan, as defined in Section 4120 or 6540 of the Civil Code.

(3) A declaration, as
 defined in Section 4135 or 6546 of the Civil Code.

(b) The tax due on each individual unit shall constitute a lien solely on that unit.

(c) The lien created pursuant to this section shall be a lien on an undivided interest in a portion of real property coupled with a separate interest in space called a unit as described in Section 4125 or 6542 of the Civil Code.

(d) The record owner of the real property may record with the condominium plan a request that the real property be exempt from separate assessment pursuant to this section. If a request for exemption is recorded, separate assessment of a condominium unit shall be made only in accordance with Section 2188.3.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1990, and shall apply to
 condominium projects for which a condominium plan is recorded after that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 79) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 48.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.7.

(a) Whenever the assessor receives a written request for separate assessment of a community apartment project, a stock cooperative, or a limited equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 11003.2, 11003.4, or 11004 of the Business and Professions Code, or any other similarly organized housing cooperative, the assessor shall, on the first lien date which occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, separately assess the individual interests described in subdivision (b) held by the owners of the project or shareholders of the corporation if the conditions specified in subdivision (c) have been met. Whenever a community apartment project or cooperative housing corporation is separately assessed, it shall continue to be separately assessed in subsequent fiscal years and once a request for separate assessment is made, it is binding on all future owners and occupants of the project or corporation.

(b) For community apartment projects, and similarly organized projects, the interest that is to be separately assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) is the value of the right of exclusive occupancy in a portion of the real property coupled with an undivided interest in the land. For cooperative housing corporations, limited equity housing cooperatives and similarly organized cooperatives, the interest that is to be separately assessed is the value of the right of exclusive occupancy which is transferable only concurrently with the transfer of the share or shares of stock in the corporation held by the person having such right of occupancy, together with an interest in appurtenant common areas.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a separate assessment of any interest described in subdivision (b) may not be made by the assessor unless:

(1) The person making the request certifies that the owners or shareholders have been notified and the request for separate assessment has been approved in the manner provided in the organizational documents of the organization involved for approval of matters affecting the affairs of the organization generally; and

(2) A diagrammatic floor plan of the improvements and a survey plot map of the land showing the location of the improvements on the land, prepared in the form required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 66425) of Division 2 of Title 7 of the Government Code, has been recorded with the county recorder and filed with the assessor.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a separate valuation to divide any existing residential structure into a subdivision, as defined in Section 66424 of the Government Code, shall not be made until a subdivision final map or parcel map, as described in Sections 66434 and 66445, respectively, of the Government Code has been recorded as required by law. If the requirement for a parcel map is waived pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66428 of the Government Code, then the assessor shall not assign any parcel numbers or prepare a separate assessment or separate valuation, unless the applicant provides a copy of the finding made by the legislative body or advisory agency, as required by that subdivision.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2605 and regardless of whether the board of supervisors has adopted a resolution in accordance with Section 2700, the tax on interests in a cooperative housing corporation or a limited-equity housing corporation separately assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be entered on the secured roll and may be paid in two installments as provided in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 2700) of Part 5. However, if:

(1) The tax on the separately assessed interest is unpaid when any installment of taxes on the secured roll becomes delinquent, the tax collector may use the procedures applicable to the collection of delinquent taxes on the unsecured roll; and

(2) The tax on the separately assessed interest remains unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the tax on the separately assessed interest, together with any penalties and costs which may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(e) The tax on an individual interest in a community apartment project, separately assessed pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be a lien solely on that interest and shall be entered on and be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll.

(f) The assessor shall provide to the principal office of each community apartment project and cooperative housing corporation within the taxing jurisdiction, at the time and in the manner as he or she deems appropriate, adequate notice of the provisions of this section and other pertinent information relative to the implementation thereof.

(g) The assessor may charge a fee for the initial cost of separately assessing a project or corporation which may be collected on the tax bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 281, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.8.

(a) Whenever the assessor receives a written request for separate assessment of time-share estates in a time-share project, as defined in Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code and as specified in subdivision (h) of this section, the assessor shall, on the first lien date that occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, separately assess each time-share estate in the project if the assessor determines that the conditions specified in subdivision (c) have been met. Whenever estates in a time-share project are separately assessed, they shall continue to be separately assessed in subsequent fiscal years and, once a request for separate assessment is made with respect to a project, it is binding on all future time-share estate owners.

(b) The interest that is to be separately assessed is the value of the right of recurrent, exclusive use or occupancy of real property, annually or on some other periodic basis, for a specific period of time that has been, or will be, allotted from the use or occupancy periods into which the project has been divided.

(c) The separate assessment of a time-share estate may not be made by the assessor unless both of the following occur:

(1) The person making the request certifies that the request for separate assessment has been approved in the manner provided in the organizational documents of the organization involved for approval of matters affecting the affairs of the organization generally.

(2) A diagrammatic floor plan of the improvements, a copy of the documents setting forth the procedures for scheduling time and units to each time-share estate owner, and a list of every time-share estate owner, with a date notation thereon showing when, according to the organization’s records, each time-share estate was acquired, have been filed with the assessor. A plot map of the land showing the location of the improvements on the land need not be filed unless requested by the assessor. The organization shall file an annual statement for each succeeding assessment year, on or before April 1, with the assessor setting forth any changes to the required information known to the organization. The list or other information provided pursuant to this section is not a public document and shall not be open to public inspection, except as provided in Section 408.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), this section shall not be construed to require any person making a request for separate assessment to meet the requirements of the Subdivision Map Act, nor shall the approval of any governmental agency be required for separate assessment.

(e) The tax on a time-share estate that is separately assessed pursuant to this section shall be a lien solely on the time-share estate and shall be entered on and be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll, provided:

(1) If the taxes on any time-share estate that is separately assessed remain unpaid at the time set for declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the taxes on the time-share estate, together with any penalties and costs that may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, may be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(2) Defaulted time-share estate taxes remaining unpaid on any prior year secured tax roll may be transferred to the unsecured roll and collected like any other tax on the unsecured roll.

(f) The assessor shall provide to the principal office of each time-share project within the taxing jurisdiction, at the time and in the manner as he or she deems appropriate, adequate notice of the provisions of this section and other pertinent information relative to the implementation thereof.

(g) The county may charge a fee for processing an application for separate assessment and for the initial and the ongoing costs, not to exceed the actual cost, of the separate assessment and billing, and mailings, with respect to a time-share project. This fee is subject to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and shall be proportionately allocated to each of the time-share estate owners. This fee may be collected commencing with the initial separate tax bills, and on subsequent tax bills, and deposited in the county’s general fund.

(h) For purposes of this section, “time-share estate” applies to time-share estates, as defined in Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code, that include a fee simple interest in the underlying property involved. However, “time-share estate” does not include time-share estates that are coupled with a leasehold interest or an estate for years.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the assessor receives a written request to terminate the separate assessment of time-share estates in a time-share project under subdivision (a), the assessor shall, on the first lien date that occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, prepare a single assessment for all time-share estates in the project. In order to obtain a single assessment, the person making the request shall provide certification that the request for a single consolidated assessment has been approved in the manner provided in the organization’s documents. The person making the request shall also state the name and address of that organization as the organization to receive the single consolidated assessment. On the first lien date, and continuing thereafter, the county shall assess the time-share project. Any lien for taxes shall attach as if the election previously made under subdivision (a) had not been made, and the county shall no longer charge the fees described in subdivision (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.9.

(a) Whenever the assessor receives a written request for separate assessment of a time-share project, as defined in Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code, the assessor shall, on the first lien date which occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, separately assess the individual interests in the project described in subdivision (b) if the conditions specified in subdivision (c) have been met. Whenever a time-share project becomes subject to separate assessment, it shall continue to be so subject in subsequent fiscal years and once a request for separate assessment is made, it is binding on all future owners and occupants of the project.

(b) The interest in a time-share project that is to be separately assessed is the value of the right of recurrent, exclusive use or occupancy of real property, annually or on some other periodic basis, for a period of time that has been, or will be, allotted from the use or occupancy periods into which the project has been divided.

(c) A separate assessment may not be made by the assessor under this section unless:

(1) The person making the request certifies that the request for separate assessment has been approved in the manner provided in the organizational documents of the organization involved for approval of matters affecting the affairs of the organization generally; and

(2) A diagrammatic floor plan of the improvements, a copy of the documents setting forth the procedures for scheduling time and units to each time-share interest owner, and a list of every time-share interest owner, with a date notation thereon showing when, according to the organization’s records, each interest was acquired, have been filed with the assessor. A plot map of the land showing the location of the improvements on the land need not be filed unless requested by the assessor. The organization shall file an annual statement for each succeeding assessment year, on or before April 1, with the assessor, setting forth any changes to the required information known to the organization. The list or other information provided pursuant to this section is not a public document and shall not be open to public inspection, except as provided in Section 408 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c), this section shall not be construed to require applicants for separate assessments to meet the requirements of the Subdivision Map Act, nor shall the approval of any governmental agency be required for separate assessment except for the assessor’s approval. 

(e) The assessor shall cumulate all the separate assessments in a time-share project and enter the total assessment on the secured roll in the name of the organization or time-share owners’ association. The assessor shall notify each owner of a time-share interest subject to separate assessment under this section of the amount of an increased assessment pursuant to Section 619.

(f) The tax on the total assessment with respect to a time-share project shall be a lien on the entire time-share project and shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll.

(g) The tax collector shall send a single tax bill, with an itemized breakdown detailing the taxes applicable to each separate assessment, to the time-share project organization or owners’ association.

(h) The assessor shall provide to the principal office of each time-share project within the taxing jurisdiction, at that time and in that manner as he or she deems appropriate, adequate notice of the provisions of this section and other pertinent information relative to the implementation thereof.

(i) The county may charge a fee for processing the application for separate assessment and for the initial and ongoing costs of separate assessment and implementing subdivision (g), not to exceed the actual costs. Fees shall be subject to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and may be collected commencing with the initial separate tax bills, and on subsequent tax bills, and shall be deposited in the county’s general fund. 

(j) This section shall not apply to time-share estates or to time-share projects that are subject to the provisions of Section 2188.8.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the assessor receives a written request to terminate the separate assessment of a time-share project under subdivision (a), the assessor shall, on the first lien date that occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, prepare a single assessment for the time-share project without an itemized breakdown detailing the taxes applicable to each separate assessment in the time-share project. In order to obtain a single assessment, the person making the request shall provide certification that the request for a single consolidated assessment has been approved in the manner provided in the organization’s documents. The person making the request shall also state the name and address of that organization as the organization to receive the single consolidated assessment. On the first lien date, and continuing thereafter, the county shall assess the time-share project. Any lien for taxes shall attach as if the election previously made under subdivision (a) had not been made, and the county shall no longer charge the fees described in subdivision (i).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.10.

(a) Whenever the assessor receives a written request for separate assessment of a pro rata portion of the real property of a mobilehome park which changed ownership pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 62.1 as the result of the transfer of a share or shares of voting stock or other ownership or membership interest or interests, the assessor shall, on the first lien date which occurs more than 60 days following the request, and on each lien date thereafter, separately assess the portion or portions of real property described in subdivision (b) if the conditions specified in subdivision (c) have been met. Whenever a portion of the real property of a mobilehome park becomes subject to separate assessment, it shall continue to be subject to separate assessment in subsequent fiscal years and once a request for separate assessment is made, it is binding on all future owners of the voting stock or other ownership or membership interests in the entity which owns the park. 

(b) The interest that is to be separately assessed is the value of the pro rata portion of the real property of the mobilehome park which changed ownership pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 62.1.

(c) A separate assessment may not be made by the assessor under this section unless the following conditions are met: 

(1) The governing board of the mobilehome park makes the request for separate assessment and certifies that the request has been approved in the manner provided in the organizational documents of the entity owning the mobilehome park. 

(2) Information is filed with the assessor listing all of the following: 

(A) The total number of outstanding shares of voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity which owns the mobilehome park. 

(B) The number of shares of voting stock, or other ownership or membership interests, which have been transferred and resulted in the change in ownership of portions of the real property of the park pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 62.1, together with the names and addresses of the owners of the transferred voting stock or other ownership or membership interests. 
